Massachusetts, session 194th, H566.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 54C the following section:- 
SECTION 54D.  (a) Each school district, vocational district, charter school, approved 
private day or residential school and collaborative school shall, subject to appropriation, provide 
and maintain at least 1 portable airway clearance device on-site at each school facility where 
instruction is provided. Each school nurse and school employee assigned to work in the school 
cafeteria shall be trained in the use of a portable airway clearance device. For the purposes of this 
section, “portable airway clearance device ” shall mean a portable medical device that uses 
manually created suction to remove blockage from the airway during a choking emergency and 
has been registered as a Class II acute upper airway obstruction device with the United States 

of 2 11 Food and Drug Administration. This section shall take effect in a city or town as provided in 
section 4 of chapter 4 of the General Laws and in a regional school district by vote of the school 
committee. 
(b) If a school system is unable to comply with the requirements of this section, the 
superintendent of the school district, the administration of a private day or residential school, or 
the board of trustees of a charter school, shall request a hardship waiver from the department of 
elementary and secondary education. The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education, 
in consultation with the Department of Public Health, shall make available to public schools a 
list of grants and other funding sources that a public school may access to facilitate the purchase 
of portable airway clearance devices. 
(c) A school employee on staff by a school subject to this section who, in good faith, 
attempts to render emergency care, including the use of a portable airway clearance device, and 
does so without compensation, shall not be liable for acts or omissions, other than gross 
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, resulting from the attempt to render such emergency 
care. 
(d) The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education, in consultation with the 
Department of Public Health, shall establish regulations and guidelines for the implementation, 
training, support, and supervision of this section.